Missouri, session 2026, SB1226.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 217, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 217.697, to read as
follows:
217.697. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, any offender who:
(1) Is incarcerated in a correctional facility after
being sentenced by a court of this state;
(2) Is serving a sentence of life without parole for a
minimum of fifty years or more and who was sentenced under
section 565.008 for an offense committed prior to October 1,
1984;
(3) Is sixty years of age or older;
(4) Has no felony conviction for a dangerous felony,
as defined under section 556.061, prior to the conviction
for which he or she is currently incarcerated; and
(5) Is not a convicted sex offender;
shall receive a parole hearing upon serving thirty years or
more of his or her sentence.
2. During the parole hearing required under subsection
1 of this section, the parole board shall determine whether
there is a reasonable probability the offender shall live

SB 1226 2
and remain at liberty without violating the law upon
release. If the board determines a reasonable probability
exists, the offender shall be eligible for release upon a
finding that the offender has:
(1) A record of good conduct while incarcerated;
(2) Demonstrated self-rehabilitation while
incarcerated;
(3) A workable parole plan, including community and
family support; and
(4) An institutional risk factor score and a mental
health score determined to be appropriate by the parole
board.
3. Any offender granted parole under this section
shall be subject to a minimum of five years of supervision
by the division of probation and parole upon release.
4. Nothing in this section shall diminish the
consideration of parole under any other provision of law
applicable to the offender or the responsibility and
authority of the governor to grant clemency, including
pardons and commutation of sentences if necessary or
desirable.
✓